Maine, session 132, LD856.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 36 MRSA §5111, sub-§1-F, as enacted by PL 2015, c. 267, Pt. DD, §3, is
amended to read:
1-F. Single individuals and married persons filing separate returns; tax years
beginning 2017 from 2017 to 2029. For tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2017
but not later than December 31, 2029, for single individuals and married persons filing
separate returns:
If Maine taxable income is: The tax is:
Less than $21,050 5.8% of the Maine taxable income
At least $21,050 but less than $50,000 $1,221 plus 6.75% of the excess over
$21,050
$50,000 or more $3,175 plus 7.15% of the excess over
$50,000
148 Sec. 2. 36 MRSA §5111, sub-§2-F, as enacted by PL 2015, c. 267, Pt. DD, §5, is
159 amended to read:
2-F. Heads of households; tax years beginning 2017 from 2017 to 2029. For tax
years beginning on or after January 1, 2017 but not later than December 31, 2029, for
unmarried individuals or legally separated individuals who qualify as heads of households:
If Maine taxable income is: The tax is:
Less than $31,550 5.8% of the Maine taxable income
At least $31,550 but less than $75,000 $1,830 plus 6.75% of the excess over
$31,550
$75,000 or more $4,763 plus 7.15% of the excess over
$75,000
2159 Sec. 3. 36 MRSA §5111, sub-§3-F, as enacted by PL 2015, c. 267, Pt. DD, §7, is
2260 amended to read:
3-F. Individuals filing married joint returns or surviving spouses; tax years
beginning 2017 from 2017 to 2029. For tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2017
but not later than December 31, 2029, for individuals filing married joint returns or
surviving spouses permitted to file a joint return:
If Maine taxable income is: The tax is:
Less than $42,100 5.8% of the Maine taxable income
At least $42,100 but less than $100,000 $2,442 plus 6.75% of the excess over
$42,100
$100,000 or more $6,350 plus 7.15% of the excess over
$100,000
3371 Sec. 4. 36 MRSA §5111, sub-§7 is enacted to read:
7. Phase-out. For tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2026, for each taxpayer
filing an income tax return under this chapter, the amount of tax calculated under subsection
1-F, 2-F or 3-F, as adjusted under section 5403, is reduced as follows.
A. For a tax year beginning in 2026, the amount of tax calculated is multiplied by 80%.
B. For a tax year beginning in 2027, the amount of tax calculated is multiplied by 60%.
Page 1 - 132LR1636(01)

C. For a tax year beginning in 2028, the amount of tax calculated is multiplied by 40%.
D. For a tax year beginning in 2029, the amount of tax calculated is multiplied by 20%.
Sec. 5. 36 MRSA §5111, sub-§8 is enacted to read:
8. Income tax eliminated. Beginning January 1, 2030, no taxes are imposed under
this section.
Sec. 6. 36 MRSA §5200, sub-§1-A, as enacted by PL 2017, c. 474, Pt. E, §2, is
amended to read:
1-A. Imposition and rate of tax beginning 2018 from 2017 to 2029. For tax years
beginning on or after January 1, 2018 but not later than December 31, 2029, a tax is
imposed for each taxable year at the following rates on each taxable corporation and on
each group of corporations that derives income from a unitary business carried on by 2 or
more members of an affiliated group:
If the income is: The tax is:
Not over $350,000 3.5% of the income
$350,000 but not over $1,050,000 $12,250 plus 7.93% of the excess over
$350,000
$1,050,000 but not over $3,500,000 $67,760 plus 8.33% of the excess over
$1,050,000
$3,500,000 or more $271,845 plus 8.93% of the excess
over $3,500,000
2113 In the case of an affiliated group of corporations engaged in a unitary business with activity
2124 taxable only by Maine, the rates provided in this subsection are applied only to the first
2135 $3,500,000 of the Maine net income of the entire group and must be apportioned equally
2146 among the taxable corporations unless those taxable corporations jointly elect a different
2157 apportionment. The balance of the Maine net income of the entire group is taxed at 8.93%.
In the case of an affiliated group of corporations engaged in a unitary business with activity
taxable both within and without this State, the rates provided in this subsection are applied
only to the first $3,500,000 of the net income of the entire group and must be apportioned
equally among the taxable corporations unless those taxable corporations jointly elect a
different apportionment. The balance of the net income of the entire group is taxed at
8.93%.
Sec. 7. 36 MRSA §5200, sub-§7 is enacted to read:
7. Phase-out. For tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2026 and ending before
January 1, 2030, for each taxpayer filing an income tax return under this chapter, the
amount of tax calculated under subsection 1-A is reduced as follows.
A. For a tax year beginning in 2026, the amount of tax calculated is multiplied by 80%.
B. For a tax year beginning in 2027, the amount of tax calculated is multiplied by 60%.
C. For a tax year beginning in 2028, the amount of tax calculated is multiplied by 40%.
D. For a tax year beginning in 2029, the amount of tax calculated is multiplied by 20%.
Sec. 8. 36 MRSA §5200, sub-§8 is enacted to read:
Page 2 - 132LR1636(01)

8. Income tax eliminated. Beginning January 1, 2030, no taxes are imposed under
this section.
Sec. 9. Spending reductions. Beginning with fiscal year 2026-27, the Department
of Administrative and Financial Services, Bureau of the Budget shall reduce the budget
each fiscal year for each department of State Government proportionally to achieve an
overall reduction in expenditures equal to the reduction of revenue under the Maine
Revised Statutes, Title 36, section 5111, subsections 7 and 8 and section 5200, subsections
7 and 8.
Sec. 10. Corrective legislation. By January 1, 2029, the Department of
Administrative and Financial Services, Bureau of Revenue Services shall submit legislation
to the joint standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over taxation matters
that corrects any conflicts in the Maine Revised Statutes resulting from the repeal of the
individual and corporate income tax as proposed in Title 36, section 5111, subsections 7
and 8 and section 5200, subsections 7 and 8. The joint standing committee may report out
a bill to the 134th Legislature in 2029 making the necessary changes.